Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 53 Rhode Island Board of Trustees on Career and Technical Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-53-1.
Board established.

Effective January 30, 2015, there is hereby established a Rhode Island board of trustees on career and technical education hereinafter referred to as the “board of trustees.”

Effective January 30, 2015, all powers, rights, obligations, and duties of the Rhode Island state advisory council on vocational education shall be transferred to the Rhode Island board of trustees on career and technical education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 2.

16-53-2.
Composition of board of trustees.

The board of trustees shall be composed of fifteen (15) members appointed by the governor in staggered terms; all the members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified, except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this section. In the month of March, the governor shall appoint members to succeed the members whose term will then next expire for a term of three (3) years commencing on the first day of July then next following and until the successor is named and qualified. A member shall be eligible to succeed himself or herself. A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term.

The fifteen (15) members of the board of trustees shall be limited to nine (9) consecutive years of service and shall consist of:

Nine (9) individuals who are representative of the private employment sector in the following manner:

Five (5) of whom shall be representative of business, industry, and agriculture including:

Two (2) members who are representatives of general business concerns;

One member who is a representative of small business concerns;

One member who is a private sector member of the governor’s workforce board, or the Rhode Island workforce investment board, or state job training coordinating council (established pursuant to section 122 of the Job Training Partnership Act, 29 U.S.C. § 1532); and

One member who is a representative of the CTE trust established pursuant to this chapter;

Two (2) members who are representatives of labor organizations, one of whom must be a career and technical teacher; and

Two (2) members from trade associations representing employers in the state.

Five (5) individuals who are representative of secondary and postsecondary educational institutions including:

One member who is a representative of the Rhode Island association of school superintendents;

One member who is a representative or the director of career and technical education programs and/or facilities;

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or his/her designee:

The commissioner of higher education, or his/her designee: and

One member who is a representative of adult education and skills training.

The secretary of commerce or his/her designee shall be the fifteenth (15th) member ex officio.

In selecting individuals to serve on the state board, due consideration shall be given to the appointment of individuals who serve on a private industry council under the Job Training Partnership Act (established pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 1512), or on councils established under other related federal acts.

Members of the board of trustees may not represent more than one of the above-specified categories, and there shall be appropriate representation of both sexes, racial, and ethnic minorities, and the various geographic regions of the state.

The state shall certify the establishment and membership of the state board of trustees at least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each planning period described in § 113(a)(1) of United States Public Law 98-524, 20 U.S.C. § 2323(a)(1).

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 58; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 34; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 34; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 49; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 2.

16-53-3.
Duties and responsibilities.

The board of trustees shall:

Advise the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the board of education on the development of a biannual state plan for career and technical education;

Advise the commissioner of elementary and secondary education so that he/she may make reports to the governor, the business community, and general public of the state, concerning:

Policies the state should pursue to strengthen career and technical education;

Initiatives and methods the private sector could undertake to assist in the modernization of career and technical education programs;

The distribution of spending for career and technical education in the state and on the availability of career and technical education activities and services within the state; and

The integration and coordination of the various policies and procedures involving career and technical education.

Furnish consultation to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the board of education on the evaluation criteria and processes for career and technical education programs within the state as they pertain to:

The establishment, continuation, and discontinuation of career preparation programs;

Incentives that promote and reward program excellence on the basis of performance;

Incentives that emphasize the needs of business and labor organizations;

Instructor preparation and qualifications in the areas of industry credentialing, development opportunities, and relevant field-based experiences;

The integration of academic and technical instruction and skill attainment in career preparation programs; and

The management and distribution of state funding allocated for the express purpose of establishing or improving career preparation program model sites.

Provide advice and consent on the policy principles and goals that govern the distribution of financial assistance furnished under this chapter, particularly with the analysis of the distribution of financial assistance between secondary career and technical education programs and postsecondary career and technical education programs;

Report annually to the board of education on topics that include:

Recommended procedures to ensure and enhance the participation of the public in the provision of career and technical education at the local level within the state, particularly the participation of local employers and local labor organizations; and

The extent to which the individuals described in former § 201(b) of United States Public Law 98-524, 20 U.S.C. § 2331(b), are provided with equal access to quality career and technical education programs;

Furnish consultation to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to evaluate, at least once every two (2) years, the career and technical education program delivery systems assisted under this chapter, and make recommendations to stakeholders on the adequacy and effectiveness of the coordination between career and technical education and the workforce demands of the Rhode Island economy and postsecondary workforce development;

Comply with all federal statutes, requirements, regulations, and guidelines, and in particular, United States Public Law 98-524 and any amendments to it;

Establish, support, and expand private-sector participation programs that enhance career and technical education at the local level within the state, particularly the participation of local employers and local labor organizations in providing funding, equipment, training, apprenticeships, work-study programs, and other services that will enhance student experiences.

Subject to the approval of the board of education, assume management and jurisdiction of state-owned-and-operated career and technical schools, at the request of the governing body of the school with a consultation from the executive director of the state-owned school, and assume management of such other career and technical schools as agreed to by local education districts and with a recommendation from the superintendent of schools.

In the event that the governing board of a state-owned-and-operated career and technical school, or a local education agency in accordance with §

16-53-3(a)(8)

, requests the board of trustees to assume management and jurisdiction of its career and technical school, then the board of education may assign the care management and responsibility of career and technical facilities to the board of trustees for the express purpose of providing coordinated career and technical educational services. Prior to the assignment of the care, management, and responsibility of the school, the trustees shall prepare a plan that shall examine and make recommendations over the:

Management of the career and technical school, including, but not limited to:

Including how the conversion from a separate school facility to a statewide system will impact:

Personnel;

Labor agreements, including existing, collective bargaining agreements;

Contractual obligations outside of labor agreements;

Management structure;

Program offerings;

Admission policies;

Facilities; and

Other items as requested by RIDE or the board of education.

Management of other state-owned facilities for the sole purpose of offering career and technical programs; and

Method of assuming ownership and management of career and technical facilities within the state that were transferred, including the integration of programs, curriculum, offerings, and the relationship of matching academic requirements to career and technical education to enhance student outcomes.

In the event the board of trustees assumes responsibility pursuant to §

16-53-3(b)

, the board of trustees shall act with the same authority as a local school committee.

In the event the board of trustees assumes responsibility pursuant to §

16-53-3(a)(8)

, the board of trustees shall recognize the collective bargaining representatives of all affected employees in each collective bargaining unit and shall recognize the collective bargaining agreements in effect for all affected employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 58; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 34; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 34; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 3.

16-53-4.
Qualifications of members.

Each appointed member of the board of trustees, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 2.

16-53-5.
Officers of the board of trustees.

The officers of the board of trustees shall be a chairperson, appointed by the governor, who shall be a representative of the private sector and vice chairperson elected from the membership. Officers shall be elected annually by a majority vote of the board of trustees members; a majority of the appointed members shall constitute a quorum. Upon allocation of designated state funding for the purpose of supporting the board of trustees’ duties and activities, the board of trustees is authorized to obtain, or to contract for, any services that may be necessary to enable it to carry out its duties. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 2.

16-53-6.
Expenses of members.

The members of the board of trustees shall serve without compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 2.

16-53-7.
Gifts, grants, or donations.

The council is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for any of the purposes of its program, and to disburse and administer the gifts, grants, or donations in accordance with the terms of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 189, § 1.

16-53-7.1.
Trustee funding.

The trustees shall be supported by funding to provide for the initiation and start-up of the trustees, and for any ongoing expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.

16-53-8.
Creation of career and technical education trust.

Rhode Island CTE trust established. Effective January 15, 2015, there is hereby created a permanent, not-for-profit corporation to be known as the Rhode Island CTE trust on career and technical education.

Composition of the CTE trust. The power of the trust shall be vested in nine (9) members appointed originally by the governor in staggered terms. All the members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. After the original appointments, the CTE trust shall have authority to appoint successors to fill terms for seven (7) of the members set forth in subsection (d)(1) of this section.

The CTE trust shall coordinate with, but shall remain independent from, both RIDE and the board of education.

The membership of the CTE trust shall be as follows:

Seven (7) individuals who are representative of the private sector in the state who shall constitute a majority of the membership. From among this group, five (5) members shall be representative of business, industry, and agriculture, including, but not limited to:

At least one representative from the various trades that are performed in the state; and

At least one representative from any trade association representing various career and technical education career clusters established by the U.S. Department of Education.

The secretary of commerce for Rhode Island; and

A member of the governor’s workforce training board, appointed by the governor. The governor shall make the reappointment to this position.

A member shall be eligible to succeed himself or herself.

The governor shall make all appointments to the CTE trust on or before January 15, 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.

16-53-9.
Functions and responsibilities of the career and technical education trust.

The trust shall:

Create partnerships with various employers to provide for internships, apprenticeship programs, voluntary work relationships, and other such partnerships that provide for student learning;

Provide advisory assistance to the board of trustees in the development of programs, curriculum, areas of focus, and concentration;

Raise funds for the use of the organization to provide grants and loans to the state board and for other purposes as determined by the private board; and

Provide any other assistance to the state board, board of education, or to the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.

16-53-10.
Trust debts and obligations.

Debts and obligations of the CTE trust shall not be or constitute a debt of the state, or any department, municipality, or subdivision thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.

16-53-11.
Career and technical trust — Responsibility.

The state of Rhode Island is not responsible for the career and technical trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.

16-53-12.
Trust gifts, grants and donations.

The trust is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for any of the purposes of its program, including state and federal funds, and to disburse and administer the gifts, grants, or donations in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 4.